Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB729.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 315.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Active pharmaceutical ingredient" or "API" means any substance that is
intended:
(a) For incorporation into a finished drug product; and
(b) 1. To furnish pharmacological activity or other direct effect in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease; or
2. To affect the structure or any function of the body;
(2) "Administer" means the direct application of a drug to a patient or research subject
by injection, inhalation, or ingestion, whether topically or by any other means;
(3)[(2)] "Administrative activities of a pharmacy" means the following functions
performed by a pharmacy adhering to all local, state, and federal patient privacy
laws:
(a) Investigating and researching a patient's insurance benefits and updating the
patient profile regarding insurance coverage;
(b) Billing and collections activities, including:
1. Contacting patients for copayments and coinsurance payments; and
2. Communicating with insurance companies;
(c) Performing patient financial assistance activities and updating patient records
accordingly;
(d) Opening faxes and accessing electronic prescriptions for the purposes of
setting up patient demographic and insurance profiles, excluding height,
weight, and allergy information, so long as the activity does not involve the
entering of a prescription order into the dispensing or medication management
system;
Page 1 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(e) Initiating insurance prior authorizations for submission to the licensed
pharmacy, including communications with the prescribing physician to
collect, record, and transmit information to insurance companies, so long as
the activity does not include the authorization or receipt of new or refill
prescription orders;
(f) Answering and transferring telephone calls, whether or not such calls require
accessing a patient record, so long as the call does not involve the
interpretation, evaluation, or implementation of a drug order; and
(g) Communicating with patients via telephone or electronically regarding refill
reminders, so long as the communication does not involve the interpretation,
evaluation, or implementation of a drug order and a pharmacist is readily
available for patient consultation;
(4)[(3)] "Adulterated" has the same meaning as in 21 U.S.C. sec. 351 and KRS
217.055;
(5) "Adverse event" means any untoward medical occurrence associated with the use
of a drug product in humans, whether or not it is considered related to the drug
product;
(6) "Association" means the Kentucky Pharmacists Association;
(7)[(4)] "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy;
(8)[(5)] "Chemical" means any substance not otherwise defined in this chapter that
is a biologically active substance intended to produce a therapeutic effect in the
body to diagnose, cure, mitigate, treat, or prevent disease;
(9) "Collaborative care agreement" means a written agreement between a pharmacist or
pharmacists and a practitioner or practitioners that outlines a plan of cooperative
management of patients' drug-related health care needs where:
(a) Patients' drug-related health care needs fall within the practitioner's or
practitioners' statutory scope of practice;
Page 2 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(b) Patients are referred by the practitioner or practitioners to the pharmacist or
pharmacists; and
(c) The agreement:
1. Identifies the practitioner or practitioners and the pharmacist or
pharmacists who are parties to the agreement;
2. Specifies the drug-related regimen to be provided, and how drug therapy
is to be monitored; and
3. Stipulates the conditions for initiating, continuing, or discontinuing drug
therapy and conditions which warrant modifications to dose, dosage
regimen, dosage form, or route of administration;
(10)[(6)] "Compound" or "compounding":
(a) Means the preparation, combining, admixing, diluting, pooling, or
reconstituting of one (1) or more drugs, APIs, or chemicals; and
(b) Shall not include mixing, reconstituting, or other such acts that are
performed in accordance with directions contained in approved labeling
provided by the product's manufacturer and other manufacturer directions
consistent with that labeling[or labeling of a drug pursuant to or in
anticipation of a valid prescription drug order, including but not limited to
packaging, intravenous admixture, or manual combination of drug
ingredients. "Compounding," as used in this chapter, shall not preclude simple
reconstitution, mixing, or modification of drug products prior to
administration by nonpharmacists];
(11)[(7)] "Confidential information" means information which is accessed or
maintained by a pharmacist in a patient's record, or communicated to a patient as
part of patient counseling, whether it is preserved on paper, microfilm, magnetic
media, electronic media, or any other form;
(12)[(8)] "Continuing education unit" means ten (10) contact hours of board approved
Page 3 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
continuing pharmacy education. A "contact hour" means fifty (50) continuous
minutes without a break period;
(13)[(9)] "Controlled substance" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.010;
(14) "Dispense" or "dispensing" means the interpretation, evaluation, and
implementation of a prescription drug order, including the preparation, final
verification, and delivery of a drug or device to a patient or patient's agent in a
suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to, or use
by, a patient[to deliver one (1) or more doses of a prescription drug in a suitable
container, appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to or use by a patient
or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug];
(15)[(10)] "Drug" means any of the following:
(a) Articles recognized as drugs or drug products in any official compendium or
supplement thereto;
(b) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or function of the
body of man or other animals;
(c) Articles, including radioactive substances, intended for use in the diagnosis,
cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or other animals;
or
(d) Articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified in
paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection;
(16)[(11)] "Drug regimen review" means retrospective, concurrent, and prospective
review by a pharmacist of a patient's drug-related history, including but not limited
to the following areas:
(a) Evaluation of prescription drug orders and patient records for:
1. Known allergies;
2. Rational therapy contraindications;
3. Appropriate dose and route of administration;
Page 4 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
4. Appropriate directions for use; or
5. Duplicative therapies;
(b) Evaluation of prescription drug orders and patient records for drug-drug,
drug-food, drug-disease, and drug-clinical laboratory interactions;
(c) Evaluation of prescription drug orders and patient records for adverse drug
reactions; or
(d) Evaluation of prescription drug orders and patient records for proper
utilization and optimal therapeutic outcomes;
(17)[(12)] "Immediate supervision" means under the physical and visual supervision of a
pharmacist;
(18)[(13)] "Investigational drug" means a new drug or biologic that meets the criteria
for investigational use as set forth in KRS 217.075 and has not been approved for
general use by the United States Food and Drug Administration;
(19) "Manufacturer" or "virtual manufacturer" of a product means:
(a) A person that holds an application approved under 21 U.S.C. sec. 355 or a
license issued under 42 U.S.C. sec. 262 for such product, or if such product is
not the subject of an approved application or license, the person who
manufactured the product;
(b) A co-licensed partner of the person described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection that obtains the product directly from a person described in this
paragraph or paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) An affiliate of a person described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection
who receives the product directly from a person described in this paragraph or
in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection; or
(d) [Any person, ]Except a practitioner[pharmacist] compounding in the normal
course of professional practice, any person within the Commonwealth
engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding,
Page 5 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
conversion, or processing of a drug, either directly or indirectly, by
extraction from substances of natural origin or independently by means of
chemical synthesis, or both, and includes any packaging or repackaging of
a drug or the labeling or relabeling of its container;
(20)[(14)] "Medical order" means a lawful order of a specifically identified practitioner
for a specifically identified patient for the patient's health care needs. "Medical
order" may or may not include a prescription drug order;
(21)[(15)] "Misbranded" has the same meaning as in 21 U.S.C. sec. 352 and KRS
217.065;
(22) "Nonprescription drugs" means nonnarcotic medicines or drugs which may be sold
without a prescription and are prepackaged and labeled for use by the consumer in
accordance with the requirements of the statutes and regulations of this state and the
federal government;
(23)[(16)] "Outsourcing facility" means a facility at one (1) geographic location or
address that:
(a) Is engaged in the compounding of human sterile drugs without a patient-
specific prescription;
(b) Has registered as an outsourcing facility with the secretary of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, Food and Drug
Administration; and
(c) Complies with all applicable state and federal requirements;
(24)[(17)] "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.015;
(25) "Pharmacist" means a natural person licensed by this state to engage in the practice
of the profession of pharmacy;
(26)[(18)] "Pharmacist intern" means a natural person who is:
(a) Currently certified by the board to engage in the practice of pharmacy under
the direction of a licensed pharmacist and who satisfactorily progresses
Page 6 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
toward meeting the requirements for licensure as a pharmacist;
(b) A graduate of an approved college or school of pharmacy or a graduate who
has established educational equivalency by obtaining a Foreign Pharmacy
Graduate Examination Committee (FPGEC) certificate, who is currently
licensed by the board for the purpose of obtaining practical experience as a
requirement for licensure as a pharmacist;
(c) A qualified applicant awaiting examination for licensure as a pharmacist or
the results of an examination for licensure as a pharmacist; or
(d) An individual participating in a residency or fellowship program approved by
the board for internship credit;
(27)[(19)] "Pharmacy" means every place where:
(a) Drugs are dispensed under the direction of a pharmacist;
(b) Prescription drug orders are compounded under the direction of a pharmacist;
or
(c) A registered pharmacist maintains patient records and other information for
the purpose of engaging in the practice of pharmacy, whether or not
prescription drug orders are being dispensed;
(28)[(20)] "Pharmacy-related primary care" means the pharmacists' activities in patient
education, health promotion, and assistance in the selection and use of over-the-
counter drugs and appliances for the treatment of common diseases and injuries, as
well as those other activities falling within their statutory scope of practice;
(29)[(21)] "Pharmacy technician" means a natural person who works under the
immediate supervision, or general supervision if otherwise provided for by statute
or administrative regulation, of a pharmacist for the purpose of assisting a
pharmacist with the practice of pharmacy;
(30)[(22)] "Practice of pharmacy" means interpretation, evaluation, and implementation
of medical orders and prescription drug orders; responsibility for dispensing
Page 7 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
prescription drug orders, including radioactive substances; participation in drug and
drug-related device selection; administration of medications or biologics in the
course of dispensing or maintaining a prescription drug order; the administration of
adult immunizations pursuant to prescriber-approved protocols; the administration
of immunizations to individuals five (5) to seventeen (17) years of age pursuant to
prescriber-approved protocols with the consent of a parent or guardian; the
administration of immunizations to a child as defined in KRS 214.032, pursuant to
protocols as authorized by KRS 315.500; drug evaluation, utilization, or regimen
review; maintenance of patient pharmacy records; and provision of patient
counseling and those professional acts, professional decisions, or professional
services necessary to maintain and manage all areas of a patient's pharmacy-related
care, including pharmacy-related primary care as defined in this section;
(31)[(23)] "Practitioner" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.015 and 218A.010, and
includes a pharmacist[given in KRS 217.015(35)];
(32)[(24)] "Prescription drug" means a drug which:
(a) Under federal law is required to be labeled with either of the following
statements:
1. "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription";
2. "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by, or on the order of, a
licensed veterinarian";
3. "Rx Only"; or
4. "Rx";[ or]
(b) Is required by any applicable federal or state law or administrative regulation
to be dispensed only pursuant to a prescription drug order or is restricted to
use by practitioners;
(c) Is intended for administration by injection into the human body other than
through a natural orifice of the human body;
Page 8 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(d) Is a biological product as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 262;
(e) Is an API; or
(f) Is an investigational drug;
(33)[(25)] "Prescription drug order" means an original or new order from a practitioner
for drugs, drug-related devices or treatment for a human or animal, including orders
issued through collaborative care agreements or protocols authorized by the board.
Lawful prescriptions result from a valid practitioner-patient relationship, are
intended to address a legitimate medical need, and fall within the prescribing
practitioner's scope of professional practice;
(34)[(26)] "Responsible practitioner" means a licensed practitioner:
(a) With the independent authority to procure, prescribe, dispense, or
administer prescription drugs and devices; and
(b) Who is responsible for supervising the operations of a terminal distributor
of prescription drugs;
(35) "Sale" or "sell" includes any transaction or offer made by any person, as
principal proprietor, agent, or employee to:
(a) Deliver;
(b) Distribute;
(c) Broker;
(d) Exchange;
(e) Gift or otherwise give away; or
(f) Transfer by passage of title, physical movement, or both;
(36) "Serious adverse event" means an adverse event that results in one (1) or more of
the following:
(a) Death;
(b) A life-threatening adverse event;
(c) Inpatient hospitalization or prolongation of existing hospitalization;
Page 9 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(d) A persistent or significant incapacity or substantial disruption of the ability
to conduct normal life functions; or
(e) A congenital anomaly or birth defect;
(37) "Society" means the Kentucky Society of Health-Systems Pharmacists;
(38)[(27)] "Supervision" means the presence of a pharmacist on the premises to which a
pharmacy permit is issued, who is responsible, in whole or in part, for the
professional activities occurring in the pharmacy;[ and]
(39)[(28)] "Terminal distributor of prescription drugs" or "terminal distributor":
(a) Means a person that:
1. Has possession, custody, or control of prescription drugs for any
purpose other than for personal use and consumption; and
2. Procures prescription drugs for sale, administration, compounding, or
dispensing by or under the supervision of a pharmacist or licensed
practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs; and
(b) Shall not include a manufacturer, repackager, outsourcing facility, third-
party logistics provider, wholesale distributor, pharmacy, or pharmacist;
(40) "United States Pharmacopeia" or "USP" means the independent, nonprofit,
scientific organization that establishes public standards for the quality, purity,
strength, and consistency of medicines, food ingredients, and dietary
supplements; and
(41) "Wholesaler" means any person who legally buys drugs for resale or distribution to
persons other than patients or consumers.
Section 2. KRS 315.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An[No] owner of a pharmacy who is not a pharmacist shall [fail to ]place a
pharmacist in charge of his or her pharmacy and[or] shall not permit any person to
compound or dispense prescription drugs, medicines, or pharmaceuticals in his or
her place of business except in the presence and under the immediate supervision of
Page 10 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
a pharmacist.
(2) A terminal distributor shall designate a responsible practitioner to serve for each
permitted location who shall along with the terminal distributor, accept
responsibility for and supervision of the operation of the permitted location in
accordance with all applicable state and federal laws. The board shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish
criteria for a responsible practitioner.
(3) A[No] manufacturer of pharmaceuticals who is not a pharmacist shall [fail to ]place
a pharmacist in charge of his or her place of business and[or] shall not permit any
person to compound prescription drugs, medicines, or pharmaceuticals in his or her
place of business, except as provided by the board through the promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
(4)[(3)] Except as provided in subsection (5)[(4)] of this section, a[no] person shall
not engage in the practice of pharmacy unless licensed to practice under the
provisions of KRS Chapter 315.
(5)[(4)] The provisions of subsection (4)[(3)] of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Pharmacist interns performing professional practice activities under the
immediate supervision of a licensed pharmacist. The nature and scope of the
activities referred to in this paragraph shall be determined by the board
through administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;
(b) Pharmacist interns and pharmacy technicians performing specifically
identified pharmacy practice activities while under the supervision of a
pharmacist. The nature and scope of the activities referred to in this paragraph
shall be determined by the board through administrative regulation
promulgated in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A;
(c) Other licensed health care professionals practicing within the statutory scope
of their professional practices; or
Page 11 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(d) Volunteer health practitioners providing services under KRS 39A.350 to
39A.366.
(6)[(5)] (a) As used in this subsection:
1. "Order entry" means the process by which pharmacy personnel validate
prescription data and enter that data into a pharmacy's dispensing or
medication management system. Prescription data includes but is not
limited to patient demographics, prescriber demographics, drug name,
strength, dosage form, quantity, the directions for use, refill
authorization, or any clarifications of the same; and
2. "Order entry verification" means the process by which a pharmacist
verifies prescription data entered in a pharmacy's dispensing or
medication management system after order entry has been completed.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a pharmacist licensed in Kentucky, or a
pharmacy technician registered in Kentucky or a pharmacy intern certified in
Kentucky who is working under the supervision of the pharmacist, from
accessing the electronic database of the pharmacy, from inside or outside of
the pharmacy, to perform order entry, order entry verification, or drug
regimen review as defined in KRS 315.010, if:
1. The pharmacy has established controls to protect the confidentiality and
integrity of protected health information;
2. No part of the pharmacy's database is duplicated, downloaded, or
removed from the electronic database; and
3. The pharmacy is located in Kentucky and is permitted by the board.
(c) Supervision required by paragraph (b) of this subsection may include
electronic supervision.
(d) This subsection shall only apply to:
1. Pharmacies that are not open to the public and do not dispense to walk-
Page 12 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
in patients in a retail setting; or
2. Hospitals licensed under KRS Chapter 216B.
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize final product
verification and dispensing of a prescription from a location outside of or
other than a pharmacy.
(f) Nothing in this subsection permits pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, or
pharmacy interns to receive hard copy prescriptions outside of the premises of
a permitted pharmacy.
(7)[(6)] [Effective April 1, 2009, ]An owner of a pharmacy shall not employ a person
to assist in the practice of pharmacy unless the person is registered as a pharmacy
technician by the board or exempt under KRS 315.135.
(8) The board may enter into agreements with other states, federal agencies, and
other entities to exchange information concerning the permitting and inspection
of pharmacies and terminal distributors located within or outside of Kentucky
and to investigate alleged violations of the laws governing the distribution of
drugs. Any information received pursuant to the agreements is subject to the
same confidentiality requirements applicable to the agency or entity from which it
was received and shall not be released without prior authorization from that
agency or entity.
Section 3. KRS 315.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not operate a pharmacy within this Commonwealth, physically
or by means of the internet, facsimile, phone, mail, or any other means, without
having first obtained a permit as provided for in KRS Chapter 315. An application
for a permit to operate a pharmacy shall be made to the board upon forms provided
by it and shall contain such information as the board requires, which may include
affirmative evidence of ability to comply with such reasonable standards and rules
and regulations as may be prescribed by the board. Each application shall be
Page 13 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
accompanied by a reasonable permit fee to be set by administrative regulation
promulgated by the board in accordance with[pursuant] to KRS Chapter 13A, not
to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(2) (a) Upon receipt of an application of a permit to operate a pharmacy,
accompanied by the permit fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250),
the board shall issue a permit if the pharmacy meets the standards and
requirements of KRS Chapter 315 and the rules and administrative
regulations of the board.
(b) The board shall refuse to renew any permit to operate unless the pharmacy
meets the standards and requirements of KRS Chapter 315 and administrative
regulations promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A[the rules and regulations of the board].
(c) The board shall act upon an application for a permit to operate within thirty
(30) days after the receipt thereof; provided, however, that the board may
issue a temporary permit to operate in any instance where it considers
additional time necessary for investigation and consideration before taking
final action upon the application. In such event, the temporary permit shall be
valid for a period of thirty (30) days, unless extended.
(3) In the review of an application for a permit for a pharmacy, the board may
consider any previous:
(a) Compliance of the applicant and any affiliated persons or entities, including
any entity under common ownership or control with the applicant; and
(b) Permit violations committed by any entity under common ownership or
control with the applicant, or by any person who substantially participates
in the ownership, management, or control of the applicant.
(4) A separate permit to operate shall be required for each pharmacy.
(5)[(4)] Each permit to operate a pharmacy, unless sooner suspended or revoked, shall
Page 14 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
expire on June 30 following its date of issuance and be renewable annually
thereafter upon proper application accompanied by such reasonable renewal fee as
may be set by administrative regulation of the board, not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars ($250) nor to increase more than twenty-five dollars ($25) per year. An
additional fee not to exceed the annual renewal fee may be assessed and set by
administrative regulation as a delinquent renewal penalty for failure to renew by
June 30 of each year.
(6)[(5)] Permits to operate shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in
the application and shall not be transferable; provided however, that a buyer may
operate the pharmacy under the permit of the seller pending a decision by the board
of an application which shall be filed by the buyer with the board at least five (5)
days prior to the date of sale.
(7)[(6)] The board may promulgate administrative[rules and] regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to ensure[assure] that proper equipment and
reference material is on hand considering the nature of the pharmaceutical practice
conducted at the particular pharmacy and to ensure[assure] reasonable health and
sanitation standards for areas within pharmacies which are not subject to health and
sanitation standards of[promulgated by] the Kentucky Cabinet for Health and
Family Services or a local health department.
(8)[(7)] Each pharmacy shall comply with KRS 218A.202.
(9)[(8)] Any pharmacy within the Commonwealth that dispenses more than twenty-
five percent (25%) of its total prescription volume as a result of an original
prescription order received or solicited by use of the internet, including but not
limited to electronic mail, shall, prior to obtaining a permit, obtain[receive and
display in every medium in which it advertises itself a seal of] approval for the
National Association of Boards of Pharmacy (NABP) Digital Pharmacy
Accreditation Program[certifying that it is a Verified Internet Pharmacy Practice
Page 15 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
Site (VIPPS)] or [a seal certifying approval of ]a substantially similar program
approved by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy. The NABP Digital Pharmacy
Accreditation Program[VIPPS], or any other substantially similar program
approved by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy, accreditation shall be maintained
and remain current.
(10)[(9)] Any pharmacy within the Commonwealth doing business by use of the
internet shall certify the percentage of its annual business conducted via the internet
and submit such supporting documentation as requested by the board, and in a form
or application required by the board, when it applies for permit or renewal.
(11)[(10)] A pharmacist may temporarily operate a pharmacy in an area not designated
on the permit as authorized in KRS 315.500.
Section 4. KRS 315.0351 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Every person or pharmacy located outside this Commonwealth which does
business, physically or by means of the internet, facsimile, phone, mail, or any
other means, inside this Commonwealth within the meaning of KRS Chapter
315, shall hold a current pharmacy permit as provided in KRS 315.035(1) and
(5)[(4)] issued by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy. The pharmacy shall be
designated an "out-of-state pharmacy" and the permit shall be designated an
"out-of-state pharmacy permit." The fee for the permit shall not exceed the
current in-state pharmacy permit fee as provided under KRS 315.035;
(b) Every out-of-state pharmacy granted an out-of-state pharmacy permit by the
board shall disclose to the board the location, names, and titles of all principal
corporate officers and all pharmacists who are dispensing prescription drugs
to residents of the Commonwealth. A report containing this information shall
be made to the board on an annual basis and within thirty (30) days after any
change of office, corporate officer, or pharmacist;
Page 16 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(c) Every out-of-state pharmacy granted an out-of-state pharmacy permit shall
comply with all statutorily-authorized directions and requests for information
from any regulatory agency of the Commonwealth and from the board in
accordance with the provisions of this section. The out-of-state pharmacy
shall maintain at all times a valid unexpired permit, license, or registration to
conduct the pharmacy in compliance with the laws of the jurisdiction in which
it is a resident. As a prerequisite to seeking a permit from the Kentucky Board
of Pharmacy, the out-of-state pharmacy shall submit a copy of the most recent
inspection report resulting from an inspection conducted by the regulatory or
licensing agency of the jurisdiction in which it is located. Thereafter, the out-
of-state pharmacy granted a permit shall submit to the Kentucky Board of
Pharmacy a copy of any subsequent inspection report on the pharmacy
conducted by the regulatory or licensing body of the jurisdiction in which it is
located;
(d) Every out-of-state pharmacy granted an out-of-state pharmacy permit by the
board shall maintain records of any controlled substances or dangerous drugs
or devices dispensed to patients in the Commonwealth so that the records are
readily retrievable from the records of other drugs dispensed;
(e) Records for all prescriptions delivered into Kentucky shall be readily
retrievable from the other prescription records of the out-of-state pharmacy;
(f) Each out-of-state pharmacy shall, during its regular hours of operation, but
not less than six (6) days per week and for a minimum of forty (40) hours per
week, provide a toll-free telephone service directly to the pharmacist in charge
of the out-of-state pharmacy and available to both the patient and each
licensed and practicing in-state pharmacist for the purpose of facilitating
communication between the patient and the Kentucky pharmacist with access
to the patient's prescription records. A toll-free number shall be placed on a
Page 17 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
label affixed to each container of drugs dispensed to patients within the
Commonwealth;
(g) Each out-of-state pharmacy shall have a pharmacist in charge who is licensed
to engage in the practice of pharmacy by the Commonwealth that shall be
responsible for compliance by the pharmacy with the provisions of this
section and for the distribution and sale of dialysate solutions and devices
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;
(h) Each out-of-state pharmacy shall comply with KRS 218A.202;
(i) Any out-of-state pharmacy that dispenses more than twenty-five percent
(25%) of its total prescription volume as a result of an original prescription
order received or solicited by use of the internet, including but not limited to
electronic mail, shall obtain[receive and display in every medium in which it
advertises itself a seal of] approval for the National Association of Boards of
Pharmacy (NABP) Digital Pharmacy Accreditation Program[certifying that
it is a Verified Internet Pharmacy Practice Site (VIPPS)] or [a seal certifying
approval of ]a substantially similar program approved by the Kentucky Board
of Pharmacy. The NABP Digital Pharmacy Accreditation[VIPPS], or any
other substantially similar accreditation, shall be maintained and remain
current;
(j) Any out-of-state pharmacy doing business in the Commonwealth of Kentucky
shall certify the percentage of its annual business conducted via the internet
and electronic mail and submit such supporting documentation as requested
by the board, and in a form or application required by the board, when it
applies for permit or renewal;
(k) Any pharmacy doing business within the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall
use the address on file with the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy as the return
address on the labels of any package shipped into or within the
Page 18 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
Commonwealth. The return address shall be placed on the package in a clear
and prominent manner;[ and]
(l) The Kentucky Board of Pharmacy may waive the permit requirements of this
chapter for an out-of-state pharmacy that only does business within the
Commonwealth of Kentucky in limited transactions; and
(m) In the review of an application for a permit for an out-of-state pharmacy,
the board may consider any previous permit:
1. Compliance of the applicant and any affiliated persons or entities,
including any entity under common ownership or control with the
applicant; and
2. Violations committed by any entity under common ownership or
control with the applicant, or by any person who substantially
participates in the ownership, management, or control of the
applicant.
(2) (a) Only subsection (1)(g) of this section shall apply to the sale or distribution of
dialysate solutions or devices necessary to perform home peritoneal kidney
dialysis to patients with end-stage renal disease, if:
1. The dialysate solutions or devices are approved or cleared by the federal
Food and Drug Administration, as required by federal law;
2. The dialysate solutions or devices are lawfully held by a manufacturer
or manufacturer's agent that is properly registered with or licensed by
the board as a manufacturer, wholesale distributer, or third-party
logistics provider under this chapter;
3. The dialysate solutions or devices are held and delivered in their
original, sealed packaging from a Food and Drug Administration-
approved manufacturing facility;
4. The dialysate solutions or devices are only delivered upon receipt of a
Page 19 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
physician's prescription by a Kentucky licensed pharmacy and the
transmittal of an order from the Kentucky licensed pharmacy to the
manufacturer or manufacturer's agent; and
5. The manufacturer or manufacturer's agent delivers the dialysate
solutions or devices directly to:
a. A patient with end-stage renal disease or the patient's designee for
the patient's self-administration of dialysis therapy; or
b. A health-care provider or institution for administration or delivery
of dialysis therapy to a patient with end-stage renal disease.
(b) 1. A manufacturer or manufacturer's agent who sells or distributes
dialysate solutions or devices under this subsection shall employ or
contract with a pharmacist who is licensed to engage in the practice of
pharmacy by the Commonwealth to conduct a retrospective audit on ten
percent (10%) of the orders processed by that manufacturer or
manufacturer's agent each month.
2. On or before February 1 of each year, an annual summary of the
monthly audits shall be prepared and submitted to the board, in the form
prescribed by the board.
3. On or before June 1 of each year, the board shall compile the summaries
of monthly audits into a single report and submit that report to the
Interim Joint Committee on Health Services.
(c) Prescriptions and records of delivery for dialysate solutions or devices sold or
distributed under this subsection shall be maintained by the manufacturer or
manufacturer's agent for a minimum of two (2) years and shall be made
available to the board upon request.
(d) As used in this subsection, "dialysate solutions" means dextrose or icodextrin
when used to perform home peritoneal kidney dialysis.
Page 20 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(e) The Kentucky Board of Pharmacy will retain oversight of the distribution of
dialysate solutions and devices under this section.
Section 5. KRS 315.121 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may refuse to issue or renew a license, permit, or certificate to, or may
suspend, temporarily suspend, revoke, fine, place on probation, reprimand,
reasonably restrict, or take any combination of these actions against any licensee,
permit holder, or certificate holder for the following reasons:
(a) Unprofessional or unethical conduct;
(b) Mental or physical incapacity that prevents the licensee, permit holder, or
certificate holder from engaging or assisting in the practice of pharmacy or the
wholesale distribution or manufacturing of drugs with reasonable skill,
competence, and safety to the public;
(c) Being convicted of, or entering an "Alford" plea or plea of nolo contendere to,
irrespective of an order granting probation or suspending imposition of any
sentence imposed following the conviction or entry of such plea, one (1) or
more or the following, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B:
1. A crime as defined in KRS 335B.010; or
2. A violation of the pharmacy or drug laws, rules, or administrative
regulations of this state, any other state, or the federal government;
(d) Knowing or having reason to know that a pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or
pharmacy technician is incapable of engaging or assisting in the practice of
pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence, and safety to the public and
failing to report any relevant information to the board;
(e) Knowingly making or causing to be made any false, fraudulent, or forged
statement or misrepresentation of a material fact in securing issuance or
renewal of a license, permit, or certificate;
(f) Engaging in fraud in connection with the practice of pharmacy or the
Page 21 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
wholesale distribution or manufacturing of drugs;
(g) Engaging in or aiding and abetting an individual to engage or assist in the
practice of pharmacy without a license or falsely using the title of
"pharmacist," "pharmacist intern," "pharmacy technician," or other term
which might imply that the individual is a pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or
pharmacy technician;
(h) Being found by the board to be in violation of any provision of this chapter,
KRS Chapter 217, KRS Chapter 218A, or the administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to these chapters;
(i) Violation of any order issued by the board to comply with any applicable law
or administrative regulation;
(j) Knowing or having reason to know that a person, pharmacist, pharmacist
intern, or pharmacy technician has engaged in or aided and abetted the
unlawful distribution of legend medications, and failing to report any relevant
information to the board;
(k) Failure to notify the board within fourteen (14) days of a change in one's
home address; or
(l) As provided in KRS 311.824(2), being convicted of a violation of KRS
311.823(2).
(2) Unprofessional or unethical conduct includes but is not limited to the following acts
of a pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or pharmacy technician:
(a) Publication or circulation of false, misleading, or deceptive statements
concerning the practice of pharmacy;
(b) Divulging or revealing to unauthorized persons patient information or the
nature of professional services rendered without the patient's express consent
or without order or direction of a court. In addition to members, inspectors, or
agents of the board, the following are considered authorized persons:
Page 22 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
1. The patient, patient's agent, or another pharmacist acting on behalf of
the patient;
2. Certified or licensed health-care personnel who are responsible for care
of the patient;
3. Designated agents of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for the
purposes of enforcing the provisions of KRS Chapter 218A;
4. Any federal, state, or municipal officer whose duty is to enforce the laws
of this state or the United States relating to drugs and who is engaged in
a specific investigation involving a designated person; or
5. An agency of government charged with the responsibility of providing
medical care for the patient, upon written request by an authorized
representative of the agency requesting such information;
(c) Selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of accessories, chemicals, drugs,
or devices found in illegal traffic when the pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or
pharmacy technician knows or should have known of their intended use in
illegal activities;
(d) Engaging in conduct likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public,
demonstrating a willful or careless disregard for the health, welfare, or safety
of a patient, or engaging in conduct which substantially departs from accepted
standards of pharmacy practice ordinarily exercised by a pharmacist or
pharmacy intern, with or without established proof of actual injury;
(e) Engaging in grossly negligent professional conduct, with or without
established proof of actual injury;
(f) Except as provided in KRS 315.500, selling, transferring, dispensing,
ingesting, or administering a drug for which a prescription drug order is
required, without having first received a prescription drug order for the drug;
(g) Willfully or knowingly failing to maintain complete and accurate records of
Page 23 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
all drugs received, dispensed, or disposed of in compliance with federal and
state laws, rules, or administrative regulations;
(h) Obtaining any remuneration by fraud, misrepresentation, or deception;
(i) Accessing or attempting to access confidential patient information for persons
other than those with whom a pharmacist has a current pharmacist-patient
relationship and where such information is necessary to the pharmacist to
provide pharmacy care;
(j) Failing to exercise appropriate professional judgment in determining whether
a prescription drug order is lawful;
(k) Violating KRS 304.39-215; or
(l) Engaging in conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4)
or (5).
(3) Any licensee, permit holder, or certificate holder entering an "Alford" plea,
pleading nolo contendere, or who is found guilty of a violation prescribed in
subsection (1)(c) of this section shall within thirty (30) days notify the board of that
plea or conviction. Failure to do so shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of
the license, certificate, or permit.
(4) Any person whose license, permit, or certificate has been revoked in accordance
with the provisions of this section, may petition the board for reinstatement. The
petition shall be made in writing and in a form prescribed by the board. The board
shall investigate all reinstatement petitions, and the board may reinstate a license,
permit, or certificate upon showing that the former holder has been rehabilitated
and is again able to engage in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill,
competency, and safety to the public. Reinstatement may be on the terms and
conditions that the board, based on competent evidence, reasonably believes
necessary to protect the health and welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth.
(5) Upon exercising the power of revocation provided for in subsection (1) of this
Page 24 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
section, the board may reasonably prohibit any petition for reinstatement for a
period up to and including five (5) years.
(6) Any licensee, permit holder, or certificate holder who is disciplined under this
section for a minor violation may request in writing that the board expunge the
minor violation from the licensee's, permit holder's, or certificate holder's
permanent record.
(a) The request for expungement may be filed no sooner than three (3) years after
the date on which the licensee, permit holder, or certificate holder has
completed disciplinary sanctions imposed and if the licensee, permit holder,
or certificate holder has not been disciplined for any subsequent violation of
the same nature within this period of time.
(b) No person may have his or her record expunged under this section more than
once.
The board shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to
establish violations which are minor violations under this subsection. A violation
shall be deemed a minor violation if it does not demonstrate a serious inability to
practice the profession; assist in the practice of pharmacy; provide home medical
equipment and services; adversely affect the public health, safety, or welfare; or
result in economic or physical harm to a person; or create a significant threat of
such harm.
(7) The board shall retain jurisdiction to investigate and to take disciplinary action
for acts or omissions committed while a person was licensed, permitted, or
certified by the board, notwithstanding the surrender, expiration, lapse, or
nonrenewal of the person's license, permit, or certification. Surrender,
expiration, lapse, or nonrenewal of a license, permit, or certification shall not
deprive the board of authority to enter findings of fact and conclusions of law,
impose discipline relating to the prior license, permit, or certification, or deny,
Page 25 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
condition, restrict, or limit any future application for licensure, permitting, or
certification.
Section 6. KRS 315.131 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every proceeding imposing a fine or for probation, suspension, or revocation of a
license, permit, or certificate issued pursuant to this chapter shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Upon failure of the licensee, permit holder, or
certificate holder to respond to the complaint at or before the time of the hearing,
the allegations set forth in the complaint shall be taken by the board as confessed.
(2) All decisions revoking or suspending a license, permit, or certificate or placing a
licensee, permit holder, or certificate holder on probation or imposing a fine shall
be made by the board.
(3) The board may when in its opinion the continued practice of the licensee or
certificate holder or the continued operation of the permit holder would be
dangerous to the health, welfare, and safety of the general public, issue an
emergency order as provided in KRS 13B.125.
(4) A licensee, permit holder, or certificate holder aggrieved by a final order of the
board may within ten (10) days after notice thereof move the board to reconsider
this order. A motion to reconsider based on newly-discovered material evidence
must be made within one (1) year of the entry of the order.
(5) A licensee, permit holder, or certificate holder aggrieved by a final order of the
board may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter
13B.
(6) (a) The board may, without benefit of a hearing, temporarily suspend a license,
certificate, or permit for not more than sixty (60) days if the president of the
board finds on the basis of reasonable evidence that a licensee, certificate
holder, or permit holder:
1.[(a)] Has violated a statute or administrative regulation the board is
Page 26 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
empowered to enforce, and continued practice or operation by the
licensee, certificate holder, or permit holder would create imminent risk
of harm to the public; or
2.[(b)] Suffers a mental or physical condition that through continued
practice or operation could create an imminent risk of harm to the
public.
(b) The emergency suspension shall take effect upon receipt by the licensee,
certificate holder, or permit holder of written notice, delivered by certified
mail or in person, specifying the statute or administrative regulation violated.
At the time the emergency suspension order issues, the board shall schedule a
disciplinary hearing to be held in accordance with the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13B within sixty (60) days thereafter.
(c) The board may extend the temporary emergency suspension for one (1) or
more additional periods not to exceed sixty (60) days provided that the:
1. Board has initiated proceedings under KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Board finds in writing that the immediate danger continues to exist;
and
3. Extension is not attributable to actions of the board.
(d) A temporary suspension shall not exceed more than one hundred eighty
(180) days absent a final order.
Section 7. KRS 315.191 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to:
(a) Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A
necessary to regulate and control all matters set forth in this chapter relating to
pharmacists, pharmacist interns, pharmacy technicians, pharmacies, terminal
distributors, wholesale distributors, and manufacturers, to the extent that
regulation and control of same have not been delegated to some other agency
Page 27 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
of the Commonwealth, but administrative regulations relating to drugs shall
be limited to the regulation and control of drugs procured, dispensed,
compounded, or administered by licensed practitioners[sold pursuant to a
prescription drug order]. This chapter shall not be construed to authorize the
board to promulgate administrative regulations relating to:
1. The practice of medicine, nursing, or any other profession or
occupation licensed or regulated by another board or agency of the
Commonwealth; or
2. [However, ]Except as provided in KRS 315.038 and Section 9 of this
Act, [nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing
the board to promulgate any administrative regulations relating to
]prices or fees or to advertising or the promotion of the sales or use of
commodities or services;
(b) Issue subpoenas, schedule and conduct hearings, or appoint hearing officers to
schedule and conduct hearings on behalf of the board on any matter under the
jurisdiction of the board;
(c) Prescribe the time, place, method, manner, scope, and subjects of
examinations, with at least two (2) examinations to be held annually;
(d) Issue and renew all licenses, certificates, and permits for all pharmacists,
pharmacist interns, pharmacies, pharmacy technicians, terminal distributors,
wholesale distributors, and manufacturers engaged in the manufacture,
distribution, or dispensation of drugs;
(e) Investigate all complaints or violations of the state pharmacy and drug laws
and the administrative regulations promulgated by the board, and bring all
these cases to the notice of the proper law enforcement authorities;
(f) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with[, pursuant to] KRS
Chapter 13A[,] that are necessary and to control the storage, retrieval,
Page 28 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
dispensing, refilling, and transfer of prescription drug orders within and
between pharmacists and pharmacies licensed or issued a permit by it;
(g) Perform all other functions necessary to carry out the provisions of law and
the administrative regulations promulgated by the board relating to
pharmacists, pharmacist interns, pharmacy technicians, pharmacies, terminal
distributors, wholesale distributors, and manufacturers;
(h) Establish or approve programs for training, qualifications, and registration of
pharmacist interns;
(i) Assess reasonable fees, in addition to the fees specifically provided for in this
chapter and consistent with KRS 61.870 to 61.884, for services rendered to
perform its duties and responsibilities, including, but not limited to, the
following:
1. Issuance of duplicate certificates;
2. Mailing lists or reports of data maintained by the board;
3. Copies of documents; or
4. Notices of meetings;
(j) Seize any drugs, chemicals, or devices[drug or device] found by the board to
constitute an imminent danger to public health and welfare;
(k) 1. Establish an advisory council to advise the board on statutes,
administrative regulations, and other matters within the discretion of the
board pertinent to the practice of pharmacy and regulation of
pharmacists, pharmacist interns, pharmacy technicians, pharmacies,
terminal distributors, wholesale distributors, and manufacturers[drug
distribution, and drug manufacturing]. The council shall provide
recommendations for updating policies and procedures, including
administrative regulations relating to the practice of pharmacy.
2. The council shall consist of nine (9) pharmacists broadly representative
Page 29 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
of the profession of pharmacy. For purposes of this subparagraph,
"broadly representative" means the following:
a. Two (2) pharmacists appointed by the Kentucky Pharmacists
Association;
b. Two (2) pharmacists appointed by the Kentucky Independent
Pharmacy Alliance;
c. One (1) pharmacist who practices or specializes primarily in a mail
order pharmacy appointed by the Kentucky Pharmacists
Association;
d. One (1) pharmacist who practices or specializes primarily in a
long-term care pharmacy appointed by Kentucky Association of
Health Care Facilities;
e. One (1) pharmacist who practices or specializes primarily in a
veterinary pharmacy appointed by the Kentucky Pharmacists
Association;
f. One (1) pharmacist who practices or specializes primarily in a
hospital pharmacy appointed by the Kentucky Society of Health-
System Pharmacists; and
g. One (1) pharmacist who practices in a specialized pharmacy that
solely or mostly provides medication to persons living with serious
health conditions requiring complex therapies, appointed by the
Kentucky Pharmacists Association.
3. Each pharmacist member shall be licensed by the board, a resident of
Kentucky, and employed for at least two (2) consecutive years in the
practice area he or she represents.
4. Members shall serve terms of up to four (4) years and may serve two (2)
consecutive terms, but shall not serve on the council for more than two
Page 30 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(2) consecutive terms. Members may continue to serve until their
successors are appointed.
5. Members shall be confirmed by roll call vote of the board at a meeting
conducted in accordance with the Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to
61.850; and
(l) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
establishing the qualifications that pharmacy technicians are required to attain
prior to engaging in pharmacy practice activities outside the immediate
supervision of a pharmacist.
(2) The board shall have other authority as may be necessary to enforce pharmacy laws
and administrative regulations of the board including, but not limited to:
(a) Joining or participating in professional organizations and associations
organized exclusively to promote improvement of the standards of practice of
pharmacy for the protection of public health and welfare or facilitate the
activities of the board; and
(b) Receiving and expending funds, in addition to its biennial appropriation,
received from parties other than the state, if:
1. The funds are awarded for the pursuit of a specific objective which the
board is authorized to enforce through this chapter, or which the board is
qualified to pursue by reason of its jurisdiction or professional expertise;
2. The funds are expended for the objective for which they were awarded;
3. The activities connected with or occasioned by the expenditure of the
funds do not interfere with the performance of the board's
responsibilities and do not conflict with the exercise of its statutory
powers;
4. The funds are kept in a separate account and not commingled with funds
received from the state; and
Page 31 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
5. Periodic accountings of the funds are maintained at the board office for
inspection or review.
(3) In addition to the sanctions provided in KRS 315.121, the board or its hearing
officer may direct any licensee, permit holder, or certificate holder found guilty of a
charge involving pharmacy or drug laws, rules, or administrative regulations of the
state, any other state, or federal government, to pay to the board a sum not to
exceed the reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case, not to
exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).
(4) In an action for recovery of costs, proof of the board's order shall be conclusive
proof of the validity of the order of payment and any terms for payment.
Section 8. KRS 315.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, officers, agents, and
inspectors of the board shall have the power and authority to:
(a) Administer oaths;
(b) Enter the[upon] premises of all facilities issued a permit or license by the
board and any facility suspected of operating as a pharmacy, terminal
distributor, wholesaler, or manufacturer, at all reasonable times for the
purpose of:
1. Making inspections and carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
Inspections:
a. Shall include areas of the facility where drugs or any other
chemicals are received, stored, compounded, or prepared for
dispensing or administration;
b. May include a review of records, including but not limited to
ownership information, invoices, purchase orders, certificates of
analysis, transaction information, compounding logs, medical
charts, prescription orders, or dispensing and administration
Page 32 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
information; and
c. If the pharmacy, terminal distributor, or manufacturer is
engaged in compounding, shall evaluate compliance with the
most current published version of the USP;
2. Conducting investigations;
3. Requiring production of books, papers, documents, records, or other
evidence for inspection or copying;
4. Seizing evidence;[ or]
5. Seizing and quarantining drugs or any other chemicals if there is
probable cause to believe that the drug or chemical is:
a. An unapproved new drug;
b. Adulterated, misbranded, or counterfeit or otherwise
unauthorized for human or animal use;
c. Labeled in a manner that indicates the substance is for research
use only; or
d. Not compounded in accordance with USP or otherwise in
violation of this chapter; or
6. Securing oral or written statements;
(c) Employ special investigators;
(d) Expend funds for the purpose of obtaining evidence; and
(e) Issue subpoenas.
(2) As used in subsection (1) of this section, "records" includes[,] but is not limited
to[,] patient records.
(3) Any decision to inspect, copy, or seize books, papers, documents, records, or other
evidence shall be at the discretion of the officer, agent, or inspector of the board.
(4) Inspection, copying, or seizure of books, papers, documents, records, or other
evidence does not affect the confidential nature of those records, and the board shall
Page 33 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
maintain the records so as to protect the confidentiality of the records.
(5) The board or its authorized representatives may investigate any location that the
board has reasonable cause to suspect is in violation of Section 9, 10, or 11 of this
Act.
(6) A pharmacist, pharmacy intern, pharmacy technician, terminal distributor,
manufacturer, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, or wholesale
distributor shall:
(a) Cooperate with federal, state, and local government investigations; and
(b) Divulge all relevant information when requested by a government agency,
except when divulging the information is otherwise prohibited by state or
federal law, including the Kentucky Rules of Evidence.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On or after January 1, 2027, a person shall not operate or engage in activities as
a terminal distributor of prescription drugs, including any prescription drugs that
are distributed, delivered, shipped, or offered for sale, administration,
compounding, or dispensing within or into this Commonwealth, without first
obtaining a permit from the board. An application for a permit to operate a
terminal distributor shall be made to the board upon forms provided by the board.
Each application shall be accompanied by a reasonable permit fee to be set by
administrative regulations promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
(2) (a) Upon receipt of an application for a permit to operate a terminal distributor
and the permit fee, the board shall issue a permit if the terminal distributor
meets the requirements of this chapter and administrative regulations
promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(b) The board shall refuse to renew any permit to operate unless the terminal
Page 34 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
distributor meets the requirements of this chapter and administrative
regulations promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A.
(c) The board shall act upon an application for a permit to operate within thirty
(30) days after the receipt of the application.
(d) The board may issue a temporary permit to operate if additional time is
necessary for investigation and consideration of the application before
taking final action. The temporary permit shall be valid for thirty (30) days,
unless extended by the board.
(3) In the review of an application for a permit for a terminal distributor, the board
may consider any previous permit:
(a) Compliance of the applicant and of any affiliated persons or entities
including any entity under common ownership or control with the
applicant; and
(b) Violations committed by any entity under common ownership or control
with the applicant, or by any person who substantially participates in the
ownership, management, or control of the applicant.
(4) The board shall:
(a) Require a separate permit for each location operated by a terminal
distributor;
(b) Require a permit to be issued to the physical address on the application;
(c) Require the primary business address or authorized service location for a
mobile or temporary facility authorized by the board be an authorized
location for procuring prescription drugs; and
(d) Prohibit a permit for a terminal distributor located in or operated from a
personal residence or any portion of a building used for residential
purposes.
Page 35 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(5) Each permit to operate as a terminal distributor, unless previously suspended or
revoked, shall expire on June 30 following its date of issuance and shall be
renewable annually thereafter upon proper application accompanied by the
renewal fee required by the board. An additional fee not to exceed the annual
renewal fee may be assessed as a delinquent renewal penalty for failure to renew
the permit by June 30 of each year.
(6) The board may deny, refuse to issue, refuse to renew, suspend, revoke, restrict, or
place conditions or limitations upon any permit issued to a terminal distributor if
the applicant, or any officer, owner, partner, member, manager, responsible
practitioner, agent, or employee of the applicant, has been found to have violated
any provision of this chapter, KRS Chapter 217 or 218A, or any administrative
regulation promulgated by the board, unless the applicant affirmatively
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that adequate safeguards have been
implemented to prevent recurrence of the violation.
(7) A permit to operate a terminal distributor shall not be transferable, except that a
buyer may operate the terminal distributor under the permit of the seller pending
a decision by the board of an application if the buyer has submitted a completed
application to the board at least five (5) days prior to the date of purchase of the
terminal distributor.
(8) Each terminal distributor shall comply with the provisions of KRS 218A.202
relating to the electronic system for monitoring controlled substances.
(9) A terminal distributor located in Kentucky doing business by use of the internet
shall:
(a) Certify the percentage of its annual business conducted via the internet and
submit supporting documentation as requested by the board;
(b) Obtain approval for the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy
(NABP) Digital Pharmacy Accreditation Program or a substantially similar
Page 36 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
program approved by the board; and
(c) Maintain and keep current accreditation form the NABP Digital Pharmacy
Accreditation Program, or any other substantially similar program
approved by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy.
(10) The following shall not be required to obtain a permit to operate as a terminal
distributor:
(a) A licensed practitioner prescribing drugs in their usual course of
professional practice unless the licensed practitioner also possesses, has
custody or control of, administers, or dispenses a prescription drug;
(b) A person possessing medications for asthma or anaphylaxis as permitted
under KRS 158.836;
(c) A person possessing medications for diabetes or seizure disorders as
permitted under KRS 158.838;
(d) A person possessing medications for health services in schools as permitted
under KRS 156.502;
(e) A person possessing overdose reversal drugs as permitted for the purposes
described in KRS 217.186;
(f) A person possessing nitrous oxide for use as a direct ingredient in food
pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 184.1545 or for testing or maintaining a plumbing or
heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system;
(g) A person possessing medical gases, sterile water, or sterile saline for direct
administration to patients or for the purpose of installation or maintenance
of home medical equipment as defined in KRS 309.402; or
(h) A facility that is owned and operated by the United States Department of
Defense, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or any other
federal agency.
(11) The board may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Page 37 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
Chapter 13A to:
(a) Ensure reasonable health and sanitation standards for areas in the physical
location a terminal distributor that are not subject to health and sanitation
standards of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or a local health
department; and
(b) Implement this section.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Prescription drugs shall only be sold, distributed, administered, or possessed in
accordance with KRS Chapters 217 and 218A.
(2) Except for a transfer of prescription drugs exempted in KRS 315.400(19), a
pharmacy, terminal distributor, or person that is exempt from a permit under this
chapter shall not purchase prescription drugs from any person other than a
licensed manufacturer, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, or
wholesale distributor.
(3) A pharmacy or terminal distributor shall not engage in the sale or transfer of, or
maintain possession, custody, or control of, prescription drugs at any
establishment or place other than the physical address listed on the permit issued
by the board unless the board has authorized a mobile or temporary location.
(4) This section shall not be construed to interfere with the performance of official
duties by any law enforcement official authorized by municipal, county, state, or
federal law to collect samples of any drug, regardless of its nature or who
possesses it.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A pharmacy, terminal distributor, or any person shall not dispense any
compounded preparation for human use unless compounded in anticipation of or
Page 38 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
pursuant to a valid prescription drug order.
(2) A pharmacy, terminal distributor, or any person shall not procure, administer,
compound, or dispense drugs or any other chemicals that are intended for
research-use only, unless the permitted pharmacy or terminal distributor is
engaged in a systematic research program and has obtained the necessary
approvals in accordance with KRS 217.075.
(3) A pharmacy, terminal distributor, or any other person shall not procure,
administer, compound, or dispense drugs or any other chemicals intended for
dispensing or administration to humans that are labeled not for use in humans.
(4) A pharmacy or terminal distributor engaged in compounding under the
supervision and direction of the pharmacist or responsible practitioner shall
compound in accordance with applicable chapters of the most current version of
USP for sterile and nonsterile compounding and shall only procure APIs from an
establishment registered with the United States Food and Drug Administration
and licensed by the board.
(5) A pharmacy or terminal distributor engaged in compounding under the
supervision and direction of a pharmacist or responsible practitioner shall
compound in compliance with the requirements of state and federal law,
including all applicable guidance documents published by the United States Food
and Drug Administration.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A pharmacy or terminal distributor that becomes aware or receives a report of a
serious adverse event associated with a drug product procured, administered,
compounded, or dispensed by the pharmacy or terminal distributor shall report
the serious adverse event to the board in a manner and form prescribed by the
board within five (5) business days of becoming aware of or receiving the report.
Page 39 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(2) The board shall provide the professional licensing board that issued a
professional license to the responsible practitioner the following:
(a) Notification of any refusal of entry into the terminal distributor's permitted
location for inspection and investigation purposes;
(b) Inspection reports that identify any violations of this chapter;
(c) 1. Investigative material, including the original complaint.
2. If the investigation reveals the culpability of other professionally
licensed individuals, the board shall share the investigative material
and the original complaints with the relevant licensing boards;
(d) Any fines levied against the responsible practitioner; and
(e) Any unpaid fines levied against the responsible practitioner.
(3) The board shall advise the professional licensing board whether additional action
is needed to protect public health and safety. Any public disciplinary action taken
by professional licensing boards shall be shared with the board.
(4) No later than August 1, 2027, and each August 1 thereafter, the board shall
submit a comprehensive report to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services on its inspection and
investigation findings in the preceding year. The report shall include but is not
limited to:
(a) The total number of pharmacy and terminal distributor compounding
inspections conducted;
(b) The total number of consumer compounding complaints received against
pharmacies and terminal distributors;
(c) A summary of the most significant findings related to violations of
compounding and procurement of drugs;
(d) The identity and amount of any drugs or any other chemicals seized by the
board;
Page 40 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(e) A summary of serious adverse events reported to the board;
(f) A summary of public disciplinary action taken by professional licensing
boards against responsible practitioners or other licensed professionals;
(g) An estimated cost to the board for inspections and investigations conducted
pursuant to Section 8 of this Act;
(h) The total amount of penalties levied and collected for violations of this
chapter; and
(i) Specific recommendations for legislative or regulatory changes, including
any requests for additional enforcement powers or oversight.
(5) This section shall not preclude the reporting of adverse events by outsourcing
facilities as required under 21 U.S.C. sec. 353b(b)(5).
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other civil or criminal remedy, the
board may maintain, in its own name, an action to restrain or enjoin any violation of
this chapter, regardless of whether there exists an adequate remedy at law.
Section 14. KRS 315.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for the provisions of KRS 315.320, any person violating any provision of
KRS Chapter 315 shall be fined for each offense not less than one hundred dollars
($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned in the county jail
for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each week that any provision of KRS
315.020, 315.030, or 315.035 is violated shall also constitute a separate offense.
(2) Any person convicted of willfully resisting, preventing, impeding, obstructing,
threatening, or interfering with the officers, agents, or inspectors of the board in the
administration of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(3) The board may levy an administrative fine not to exceed five thousand dollars
Page 41 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
($5,000) for each offense, for any violation of KRS 315.121. All such fines shall be
deposited to the credit of the licensing board to be used by the board in carrying out
the provisions of this chapter.
(4) The board may refuse to issue or renew a permit, or may suspend, temporarily
suspend, revoke, fine, or reasonably restrict any permit holder for any violation of
KRS 315.0351. Any administrative fine levied by the board shall not exceed five
thousand dollars ($5,000) for any violation of KRS 315.0351. All such fines shall
be deposited to the credit of the licensing board to be used by the Board of
Pharmacy in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
(5) For a violation of KRS 315.320, the Board of Pharmacy may, in addition to any
other civil or criminal penalty, levy an administrative fine not exceeding one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). All such fines shall be deposited to the credit
of the Board of Pharmacy in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
(6) (a) Any person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly violates KRS
216B.200 to 216B.210 is guilty of a Class D felony.
(b) Any person who violates KRS 216B.200 to 216B.210 shall be fined not more
than one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 440.200, the Attorney General may demand from the
Governor of any other state the surrender of any person found in the other
state who is charged in Kentucky with the crime of violating KRS 216B.200
to 216B.210. The provisions for extradition under this subsection shall apply
to any such demand even if the person whose surrender is demanded was not
in Kentucky at the time of the commission of the crime. Neither the demand,
the oath, nor any proceedings for extradition pursuant to this section need
state or show that the person whose surrender is demanded has fled from
justice, or at the time of the commission of the crime was in Kentucky or the
other state.
Page 42 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
(7) Any person in violation of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of Section 10 of this Act shall
be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for
each subsequent offense.
(8) Unless another specific penalty is provided in this section, any person who
violates any provision of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of Section 11 of this Act shall
be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for
each subsequent offense.
Section 15. KRS 194A.800 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "pilot program" means a program in a county or set
of counties, or a subset or subsets of the population, as designated by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services and the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.
(2) A pilot program is established to analyze the outcomes and effectiveness of a
community pharmacy care delivery model for medication-assisted therapy for
treatment of substance abuse in order to ensure that the Commonwealth is:
(a) Using approaches that have been shown to be effective;
(b) Intervening early at important stages and transitions; and
(c) Intervening in appropriate settings and domains.
(3) Sources of data for the pilot program shall include, at a minimum, claims data from
the Department for Medicaid Services, including claims data from Medicaid
managed care organizations submitted to the Department for Medicaid Services.
(4) As funds are available, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall initiate a
pilot program to determine, collect, and analyze performance measurement data for
a community pharmacy care delivery model for noncontrolled medication-assisted
therapy as part of substance abuse treatment services to determine practices that
increase access to treatment, reduce frequency of relapse, provide better outcomes
for patients, and control health costs related to substance abuse treatment. Program
Page 43 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
components shall:
(a) Use a community pharmacy care delivery model for noncontrolled
medication-assisted therapy for the treatment of substance abuse, as
authorized by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy pursuant to a prescription
drug order as defined in KRS 315.010[(25)];
(b) Include a wraparound services model that engages psychological and social
support for the patient;
(c) Establish collaborative relationships between detention facilities, drug courts,
community pharmacists, and practitioners who provide psychosocial
interventions to evaluate individuals' eligibility for participation in a
community pharmacy care delivery model for noncontrolled medication-
assisted therapy; and
(d) Include pilot program data collection designed to inform the outcomes and
effectiveness of a community pharmacy care delivery model for medication-
assisted therapy for treatment of substance abuse.
(5) By December 31, 2019, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide a
joint report to the Legislative Research Commission and the Office of the Governor
that:
(a) Details the findings of the pilot program; and
(b) Includes recommendations based on the pilot program's results for optimizing
substance abuse treatment services provided in community pharmacies.
Section 16. KRS 217.215 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Board of Pharmacy, its agents and inspectors shall have the same powers of
inspection and enforcement as the cabinet under KRS 217.005 to 217.215[, insofar
as it relates to drugs in licensed pharmacies].
(2) The Board of Pharmacy may establish regulations relating to the storage and
retrieval of prescription records in licensed pharmacies, including regulations
Page 44 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
regarding computerized recordkeeping systems.
(3) (a) No prescription for any drug may be refilled by a pharmacist unless
authorized by the prescribing practitioner, except that, in emergency situations
in which such authorization may not be readily or easily obtained from the
practitioner, a pharmacist may:
1. Dispense up to a seventy-two (72) hour supply of maintenance
medication;
2. Dispense greater than a seventy-two (72) hour supply of maintenance
medication if:
a. The standard unit of dispensing for the drug exceeds a seventy-two
(72) hour supply;
b. The pharmacist dispenses a supply of the drug that is equal to the
standard unit of dispensing for the drug; and
c. The drug is used for insulin therapy or the treatment of chronic
respiratory diseases; and
3. Dispense up to a thirty (30) day supply of maintenance medication in
emergency situations as authorized by KRS 315.500.
(b) Emergency refills dispensed under this subsection shall not be authorized for
any controlled substance or for any drug which is not essential to maintenance
of life or continuation of therapy in chronic disease conditions.
(c) The Board of Pharmacy shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry
out the provisions of this subsection.
Section 17. KRS 217.913 is amended to read as follows:
The provisions of KRS 217.907 to 217.917 shall not apply to drug products compounded
by a pharmacist licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 315, in a pharmacy or terminal
distributor's permitted location operating under a permit authorized by the board[as
required by KRS 315.035].
Page 45 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1786
Section 18. KRS 315.205 is amended to read as follows:
Upon the request of an individual or his or her parent or guardian, a pharmacist who
administers an immunization to an individual who is five (5) to seventeen (17) years of
age, as authorized in the practice of pharmacy as defined in KRS 315.010[(22)], shall
provide notification of the immunization to the individual's primary care provider.
Section 19. This Act may be cited as Jimmie's Law.
Section 20. Whereas it is critical that the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy have the
authority to ensure the safety of the pharmaceutical drug supply for the health and well-
being of the citizens of the Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 46 of 46
XXXX 2/17/2026 9:36 AM Jacketed